Rhode Island, session 2025, SB565.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 12-12-17 of the General Laws in Chapter 12-12 entitled "Indictments,
Informations and Complaints" is hereby amended to read as follows:
12-12-17. Statute of limitations.
(a) There shall be no statute of limitations for the following offenses: treason against the
state; any homicide, arson, first-degree arson, second-degree arson, third-degree arson, burglary,
counterfeiting, forgery, robbery, rape, first-degree sexual assault, first-degree child molestation
sexual assault, second-degree child molestation sexual assault, bigamy; manufacturing, selling,
distribution, or possession with intent to manufacture, sell, or distribute, a controlled substance
under the Uniform Controlled Substance Act, chapter 28 of title 21; or any other offense for which
the maximum penalty provided is life imprisonment.
(b) The statute of limitations for the following offenses shall be ten (10) years: larceny
under § 11-41-2 (receiving stolen goods), § 11-41-3 (embezzlement and fraudulent conversion), §
11-41-4 (obtaining property by false pretenses or personation), § 11-41-11 (embezzlement by bank
officer or employee), § 11-41-12 (fraudulent conversion by agent or factor), and § 11-41-13
(obtaining signature by false pretenses), or any larceny that is punishable as a felony; any violation
of chapter 7 of title 11 (bribery); any violation of § 11-18-1 (giving false document to agent,
employee, or public official); perjury; any violation of chapter 42 of title 11 (threats and extortion);
any violation of chapter 15 of title 7 (racketeer influenced and corrupt organizations); any violation

of chapter 57 of title 11 (racketeer violence); any violation of chapter 36 of title 6 (antitrust law);
any violation of § 11-68-2 (exploitation of an elder); any violation of § 11-41-11.1 (unlawful
appropriation); any violation of § 11-18-6 (false financial statement to obtain loan or credit); any
violation of § 19-9-28 (false statement to obtain a loan); any violation of § 19-9-29 (bank fraud);
or any violation of § 11-18-34 (residential mortgage fraud); or any violation of § 11-37-4 (second
degree sexual assault).
(c) The statute of limitations for any other criminal offense shall be three (3) years, unless
a longer statute of limitations is otherwise provided for in the general laws.
(d) Any person who participates in any offense, either as a principal accessory or
conspirator, shall be subject to the same statute of limitations as if the person had committed the
substantive offense.
(e) The statute of limitations for any violation of chapter 18.9 of title 23 (refuse disposal),
chapter 19 of title 23 (solid waste management corporation), chapter 19.1 of title 23 (hazardous
waste management), chapter 12 of title 46 (water pollution), and chapter 13 of title 46 (public
drinking water supply) shall be seven (7) years from the time that the facts constituting the offense
or violation shall have become known to law enforcement authorities, unless a longer statute of
limitations is otherwise provided for in the general laws.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000345
========
LC000345 - Page 2 of 3